test/src/morphology/adj_Likestavelser_S_adjektiv_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against Marit/Maja
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

Tests:

  Adjective - aelmies: # 
    aelmies+A+Attr: aelmies 
    aelmies+A+Sg+Nom: [aelmie, aelmies]

  Adjective - aelpies: # 
    aelpies+A+Attr: aelpies 
    aelpies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: aelpebe 
    aelpies+A+Sg+Nom: [aelpie, aelpies]
    aelpies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: aelpemes

  Adjective - aerkies: # ?
    aerkies+A+Attr: aerkies 
    aerkies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: aerkebe 
    aerkies+A+Sg+Nom: [aerkie, aerkies]
    aerkies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: aerkemes

  Adjective - aevhkies: # 
    aevhkies+A+Attr: aevhkies 
    aevhkies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: aevhkebe 
    aevhkies+A+Sg+Nom: [aevhkie, aevhkies]
    aevhkies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: aevhkemes
    
  Adjective - båeries: # c 
    båeries+A+Attr: båeries 
    båeries+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [båarasabpa, båarasåbpoe]
    båeries+A+Sg+Nom: båeries 
    båeries+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [båarasommes, båarasammes]
    
  Adjective - daemies: # 
    daemies+A+Attr: daemies 
    daemies+A+Sg+Nom: daemies 

  Adjective - daerpies: # 
    daerpies+A+Attr: daerpies 
    daerpies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: daerpebe 
    daerpies+A+Sg+Nom: daerpies 
    daerpies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: daerpemes
    
  Adjective - dearkoes: # 
    dearkoes+A+Attr: dearkoes 
    dearkoes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [dearkoesabpa, dearkoesåbpoe]
    dearkoes+A+Sg+Nom: dearkoes 
    dearkoes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [dearkoesommes, dearkasammes]
    
  Adjective - dasmoes: # 
    dasmoes+A+Attr: dasmoes 
    dasmoes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [dasmoesabpa, dasmoesåbpoe]
    dasmoes+A+Sg+Nom: dasmoes 
    dasmoes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [dasmoesommes, dasmasammes]

  Adjective - dearkoeh: # 
    dearkoeh+A+Attr: dearkoeh 
    dearkoeh+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [dearkahkabpa, dearkoehkåbpoe]
    dearkoeh+A+Sg+Nom: dearkoeh 
    dearkoeh+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [dearkoehkommes, dearhkakammes]


  Adjective - beagkoes: # 
    beagkoes+A+Attr: beagkoes 
    beagkoes+A+Sg+Nom: beagkoes
    
    
  Adjective - dovres: # c 
    dovres+A+Attr: dovres 
    dovres+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [dovresabpa, dovresåbpoe]
    dovres+A+Sg+Nom: dovres 
    dovres+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [dovresommes, dovresammes]

  Adjective - dulvies: # 
    dulvies+A+Attr: dulvies 
    dulvies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: dulvebe 
    dulvies+A+Sg+Nom: [dulvie, dulvies]
    dulvies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: dulvemes

  Adjective - duvhties: # 
    duvhties+A+Attr: duvhties 
    duvhties+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: duvhtebe 
    duvhties+A+Sg+Nom: [duvhtie, duvhties]
    duvhties+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: duvhtemes
    
    
  Adjective - dåsmoes: # 
    dåsmoes+A+Attr: dåsmoes 
    dåsmoes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [dåsmasabpa, dåsmoesåbpoe]
    dåsmoes+A+Sg+Nom: dåsmoes 
    dåsmoes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [dåsmoesommes, dåsmasabpa]
        
  Adjective - eejles: # 
    eejles+A+Attr: eejles 
    eejles+A+Sg+Nom: eejles
       
  Adjective - ellies: # 
    ellies+A+Attr: ellies 

  Adjective - elmies: # 
    elmies+A+Attr: elmies 
    elmies+A+Sg+Nom: elmies 

  Adjective - faatoes: # 
    faatoes+A+Attr: faatoes 
    faatoes+A+Sg+Nom: faatoes 
  

  Adjective - faavroes: # c 
    faavroes+A+Attr: faavroes 
    faavroes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [faavrobe, faavrebe]
    faavroes+A+Sg+Nom: [faavroe, faavroes]
    faavroes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [faavromes, faavremes]

  Adjective - fahkoes: # 
    fahkoes+A+Attr: fahkoes 
    fahkoes+A+Sg+Nom: [fahkan, fahkoes]
    
    
  Adjective - gaavnoes: # 
    gaavnoes+A+Attr: gaavnoes 

  Adjective - gaelhvies: # 
    gaelhvies+A+Attr: gaelhvies 
    gaelhvies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: gaelhvebe 
    gaelhvies+A+Sg+Nom: [gaelhvie, gaelhvies]
    gaelhvies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: gaelhvemes

  Adjective - gaertjies: # 
    gaertjies+A+Attr: gaertjies 
    gaertjies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: gaertjebe 
    gaertjies+A+Sg+Nom: [gaertjie, gaertjies]
    gaertjies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: gaertjemes

  Adjective - gaervies: # 
    gaervies+A+Attr: gaervies 
    gaervies+A+Sg+Nom: gaervies     
    
  Adjective - geehpes: # 
    geehpes+A+Attr: [geehpes, geehpes]
    geehpes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [geehpesabpa, geehpesåbpoe, giehpebe, giehpebe]
    geehpes+A+Sg+Nom: [geehpes, geehpes]
    geehpes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [geehpesommes, geehpesammes, geehpemes]

  Adjective - geeles: # 
    geeles+A+Attr: geeles 
    geeles+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [geelesabpa, geelesåbpoe]
    geeles+A+Sg+Nom: geeles 
    geeles+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: geelesommes
    
    
  Adjective - geljies: # 
    geljies+A+Attr: geljies 
    geljies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: geljebe 
    geljies+A+Sg+Nom: [geljie, geljies]
    geljies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: geljemes

  Adjective - giedtsies: # 
    giedtsies+A+Attr: giedtsies 
    giedtsies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: giedtsebe 
    giedtsies+A+Sg+Nom: [giedtsie, giedtsies]
    giedtsies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: giedtsemes

  Adjective - giefies: # 
    giefies+A+Attr: giefies 
    giefies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: giefebe 
    giefies+A+Sg+Nom: [giefie, giefies]
    giefies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: giefemes
    
  Adjective - gieries: # 
    gieries+A+Attr: gieries 
    gieries+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [gearahkabpa, gearahkåbpoe]
    gieries+A+Sg+Nom: gearehke 
    gieries+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [gearahkommes, gearahkammes]
        
  Adjective - guelhties: # 
    guelhties+A+Attr: guelhties 
    guelhties+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: guelhtebe 
    guelhties+A+Sg+Nom: [guelhtie, guelhties]
    guelhties+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: guelhtemes

  Adjective - guhkies: # c 
    guhkies+A+Attr: guhkies 
    guhkies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: guhkebe 
    guhkies+A+Sg+Nom: [guhkie, guhkies]
    guhkies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: guhkemes
    
  Adjective - gåaroes: # 
    gåaroes+A+Attr: gåaroes 
    gåaroes+A+Sg+Nom: gåaroes
    
  Adjective - gööles: # 
    gööles+A+Attr: gööles 
    gööles+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [göölesabpa, göölesåbpoe]
    gööles+A+Sg+Nom: gööles 
    gööles+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [göölesommes, göölesammes] 
    
  Adjective - hearskoes: # 
    hearskoes+A+Attr: hearskoes 
    hearskoes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [hearskobe, hearskebe]
    hearskoes+A+Sg+Nom: [hearskoe, hearskos]
    hearskoes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [hearskomes, hearskemes]
    
    
  Adjective - hujnies: # 
    hujnies+A+Attr: hujnies 
    hujnies+A+Sg+Nom: håjnan 

  Adjective - håjnoes: # 
    håjnoes+A+Attr: håjnoes 
    håjnoes+A+Sg+Nom: håjnan 
    
    
  Adjective - hajnas: # 
    håjnoes+A+Attr: hajnas 
    håjnoes+A+Sg+Nom: hajnan 
    
  Adjective - jearsoes: # 
    jearsoes+A+Attr: jearsoes 
    jearsoes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [jearsoesåbpoe, jearsasabpa]
    jearsoes+A+Sg+Nom: jearsoes 
    jearsoes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [jearsoesommes, jearsasammes]
    
    
  Adjective - jolle: # c 
    jolle+A+Attr: jolle 
    jolle+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: jollebe 
    jolle+A+Sg+Nom: jolle 
    jolle+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: jollemes

  Adjective - jorpe: # 
    jorpe+A+Attr: jorpe 
    jorpe+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: jorpebe 
    jorpe+A+Sg+Nom: jorpe 
    jorpe+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: jorpemes

  Adjective - jovje: # 
    jovje+A+Attr: jovje 
    jovje+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: jovjebe 
    jovje+A+Sg+Nom: jovje 
    jovje+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: jovjemes

  Adjective - jueskies: # c 
    jueskies+A+Attr: jueskies 
    jueskies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: jueskebe 
    jueskies+A+Sg+Nom: [jueskie, jueskies]
    jueskies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: jueskemes       
    
  Adjective - jïlle: # 
    jïlle+A+Attr: jïlle 
    jïlle+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: jïllebe 
    jïlle+A+Sg+Nom: jïlle 
    jïlle+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: jïllemes

  Adjective - klaeries: # 
    klaeries+A+Attr: klaeries 
    klaeries+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: klaerebe 
    klaeries+A+Sg+Nom: [klaerie, klaeries]
    klaeries+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: klaeremes

  Adjective - kraejhpies: # 
    kraejhpies+A+Attr: kraejhpies 
    kraejhpies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: kraejhpebe 
    kraejhpies+A+Sg+Nom: [kraejhpie, kraejhpies]
    kraejhpies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: kraejhpemes

  Adjective - kraevies: # 
    kraevies+A+Attr: kraevies 
    kraevies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: kraevebe 
    kraevies+A+Sg+Nom: [kraevie, kraevies]
    kraevies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: kraevemes    
    
  Adjective - kroenes: # 
    kroenes+A+Attr: kroenes 

  Adjective - kruana: # 
    kruana+A+Attr: kruana 
    kruana+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [kruenebe, kråanebe]
    kruana+A+Sg+Nom: kruana 
    kruana+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [kroenemes, kråanemes]

  Adjective - kruepies: # 
    kruepies+A+Attr: kruepies 
    kruepies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: kruepebe 
    kruepies+A+Sg+Nom: [kruepie, kruepies]
    kruepies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: kruepemes   
    
  Adjective - laemies: # 
    laemies+A+Attr: laemies 
    laemies+A+Sg+Nom: [laemie, laemies]

  Adjective - latjkes: # 
    latjkes+A+Attr: latjkes 

  Adjective - liehties: # c 
    liehties+A+Attr: liehties 
    liehties+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: liehtebe 
    liehties+A+Sg+Nom: [liehtie, liehties]
    liehties+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: liehtemes

  Adjective - loeves: # c 
    loeves+A+Attr: loeves 
    loeves+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: loevebe 
    loeves+A+Sg+Nom: loeves 
    loeves+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: loevemes
       
  Adjective - låemties: # 
    låemties+A+Attr: låemties 
    låemties+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: låemtebe 
    låemties+A+Sg+Nom: [låemtie, låemties]
    låemties+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: låemtemes

  Adjective - låpsoes: # 
    låpsoes+A+Attr: låpsoes 
    låpsoes+A+Sg+Nom: låpsoes 

  Adjective - lustes: # c 
    lustes+A+Attr: lustes 
    lustes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: lustebe 
    lustes+A+Sg+Nom: [luste, lustes]
    lustes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: lustemes
       
  Adjective - lïhkes: # c 
    lïhkes+A+Attr: lïhkes 
    lïhkes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: lïhkebe 
    lïhkes+A+Sg+Nom: lïhkes 
    lïhkes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: lïhkemes

  Adjective - löövles: # 
    löövles+A+Attr: löövles 
    löövles+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [löövlebe, lïevlebe, lïevlebe]
    löövles+A+Sg+Nom: löövles 
    löövles+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [löövlemes, löövlemes, löövlemes]
    
  Adjective - miehtjies: # 
    miehtjies+A+Attr: miehtjies
    
  Adjective - måasas: # 
    måasas+A+Attr: måasas 
    måasoes+A+Sg+Nom: måasa
       
  Adjective - måaskes: # 
    måaskes+A+Attr: måaskes 
    måaskes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: måaskebe 
    måaskes+A+Sg+Nom: måaskes 
    måaskes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: måaskemes

  Adjective - måasoes: # 
    måasoes+A+Attr: måasoes 
    måasoes+A+Sg+Nom: måasoe 
    
  Adjective - måskoes: # 
    måskoes+A+Attr: måskoes 
    måskoes+A+Sg+Nom: måskoes 
    
  Adjective - möövhkes: # 
    möövhkes+A+Attr: möövhkes 
    möövhkes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: möövhkebe 
    möövhkes+A+Sg+Nom: möövhkes 
    möövhkes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: möövhkemes
    
  Adjective - njaelkies: # 
    njaelkies+A+Attr: njaelkies 
    njaelkies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: njaelkebe 
    njaelkies+A+Sg+Nom: [njaelkie, njaelkies]
    njaelkies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: njaelkemes
    
  Adjective - njeerpes: # 
    njeerpes+A+Attr: [njeerpes, njeerpes]
    njeerpes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [njeerpebe, njeerpesabpa, njeerpesåbpoe]
    njeerpes+A+Sg+Nom: [njeerpes, njeerpes]
    njeerpes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [njeerpemes, njeerpesommes, njeerpesammes]
    
  Adjective - noere: # c 
    noere+A+Attr: noere 
    noere+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [nuerebe, nuerebe]
    noere+A+Sg+Nom: noere 
    noere+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: nööremes
        
  Adjective - nåake: # c 
    nåake+A+Attr: nåake 
    nåake+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [nåakebe, vearrebe, vïerrebe]
    nåake+A+Sg+Nom: nåake 
    nåake+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [nåakemes, vearremes, vïerremes, vïerremes]

  Adjective - nåekies: # 
    nåekies+A+Attr: nåekies 
    nåekies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: nåekebe 
    nåekies+A+Sg+Nom: nåekie 
    nåekies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: nåekemes
    
  Adjective - nænnoes: # c 
    nænnoes+A+Attr: [nænnoes, nænnoes]
    nænnoes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [nænnobe, nænnebe, nænnasabpa, nænnoesåbpoe]
    nænnoes+A+Sg+Nom: [nænnoe, nænnos, nænnoes]
    nænnoes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [nænnomes, nænnemes, nænnoesommes, nænnasammes]
    
  Adjective - onne: # c 
    onne+A+Attr: onne 
    onne+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: unnebe 
    onne+A+Sg+Nom: [onne]
    onne+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: unnemes
    
    Adjective - unnie: # c 
    onne+A+Attr: unnies 
    onne+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: unnebe 
    onne+A+Sg+Nom: [unnie]
    onne+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: unnemes
